Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2915HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 866 Section 1. Section 481A.87, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Prior permission is not required for an owner or tenant 3 of agricultural property or an associated residence located 4 outside the corporate limits of a city to take, capture using a 5 cage trap or dog-proof trap, shoot, or temporarily possess, for 6 the purpose of destroying or disposing of, a raccoon, opossum, 7 any species of goose, or skunk on the property if the owner or 8 tenant in good faith deems the animal to be a nuisance. This 9 subsection does not apply to animals listed pursuant to the 10 federal Endangered Species Act or listed as endangered by the 11 commission pursuant to section 481B.3 . 12